Illinois, session 104th, HB4948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1038 and 5.1039 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance 8Device Fund. 9    (30 ILCS 105/5.1039 new)10    Sec. 5.1039. The Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit Fee 11Fund.  12    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 13changing Section 6-208 and by adding Section 6-206.3 as 14follows: 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-206.3 new)16    Sec. 6-206.3. Intelligent Speed Assistance Program; 17Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit. 18    (a) The General Assembly finds that:19        (1) speeding is a contributing factor in approximately 20    29% of all traffic fatalities in the United States,   HB4948 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    resulting in over 12,000 deaths annually, as documented by 2    the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration;3        (2) traditional enforcement methods, including fines, 4    license points, and suspensions, have proven insufficient 5    to deter the most dangerous repeat speeders;6        (3) approximately 75% of drivers with suspended 7    licenses continue to drive, creating ongoing public safety 8    risks, as documented in research published by the National 9    Cooperative Highway Research Program;10        (4) intelligent speed assistance technology provides a 11    proven, cost-effective alternative to license suspension 12    that maintains individual mobility while protecting public 13    safety;14        (5) intelligent speed assistance technology has 15    demonstrated significant safety benefits in municipal 16    fleet pilot programs, including a 64% reduction in 17    speeding in New York City's program, as documented by the 18    New York City Department of Citywide Administrative 19    Services in partnership with the United States Department 20    of Transportation Volpe National Transportation Systems 21    Center; and22        (6) interstate travel is common, and drivers subject 23    to intelligent speed assistance requirements in one 24    jurisdiction frequently operate vehicles in other 25    jurisdictions.26    (b) The purposes of this Section are to:  HB4948 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1        (1) establish a uniform Intelligent Speed Assistance 2    Program applicable to repeat and egregious speed 3    violators;4        (2) provide an alternative to driver's license 5    suspension that maintains mobility while ensuring public 6    safety;7        (3) create uniform violation standards and Program 8    requirements to ensure continuity when participants travel 9    or relocate between jurisdictions;10        (4) establish clear lines of authority for Program 11    administration and enforcement;12        (5) protect participant privacy while enabling 13    necessary data sharing for Program integrity;14        (6) ensure Program sustainability through 15    participant-funded cost recovery;16        (7) enable interstate reciprocity and data exchange; 17    and18        (8) establish uniform penalties for tampering and 19    noncompliance.20    (c) As used in this Section:21    "Active intelligent speed assistance device" or 22"intelligent speed assistance device" means an aftermarket 23device that actively prevents a motor vehicle from exceeding 24the applicable speed limit and does not interact with the 25braking system and is installed in or integrated with a motor 26vehicle that determines the applicable speed limit and   HB4948 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1prevents the vehicle from exceeding that limit, excluding 2dynamic speed zones, using technology such as, but not limited 3to, integrated location-based technology, digital mapping 4data, or camera-based sign recognition. "Active intelligent 5speed assistance device" or "intelligent speed assistance 6device" includes all necessary components for installation, 7operation, monitoring, and data transmission.8    "Approved service provider" or "service provider" means a 9person, firm, or business entity certified by the Secretary of 10State to install, service, tune, monitor, and remove active 11intelligent speed assistance devices in accordance with 12standards established under this Section.13    "Driver record" means the record maintained by the 14Secretary of State or obtained from another jurisdiction 15through the National Driver Register, the Commercial Driver 16License Information System, or the State-to-State Verification 17Service containing information about a person's driver 18history, including convictions, restrictions, and suspensions.19    "Dynamic speed zone" means an area where speed limits are 20adjusted based upon certain conditions.21    "Enrollment" means the date an intelligent speed 22assistance device is installed after an Intelligent Speed 23Assistance Permit is issued.24    "Failure to maintain" means the participant's failure to 25keep the active intelligent speed assistance device in proper 26working order at all times, including, but not limited to, any   HB4948 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1loss of device power for 24 continuous hours or more or any 2device lockout.3    "Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit" or "Permit" means a 4permit issued to a participant in the Intelligent Speed 5Assistance Program that allows the participant to drive only 6vehicles equipped with an active intelligent speed assistance 7device.8    "Intelligent Speed Assistance Program" or "Program" means 9the Intelligent Speed Assistance Program established under 10this Section.11    "Participant" means a person who elects to install or is 12required to install an active intelligent speed assistance 13device upon suspension of the person's driver's license for 14conviction of 2 qualifying offenses in a 12-month period and 15who is restricted to operating only vehicles equipped with an 16active intelligent speed assistance device under this Section.17    "Participating jurisdiction" means any state, territory, 18or the District of Columbia that has enacted substantially 19similar legislation to this Section.20    "Program violation" means tampering with, circumventing, 21unauthorized removal of the device, or other activities as 22defined by the Secretary of State.23    "Qualifying offense" means a conviction of a violation of 24Section 11-601.5 for driving 26 miles per hour or more in 25excess of the applicable speed limit or a similar conviction 26in another jurisdiction.  HB4948 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    "Tamper" means any act intended to disable, circumvent, or 2interfere with the proper operation of an active intelligent 3speed assistance device, including, but not limited to, 4unauthorized removal, physically damaging the device, 5disconnecting electrical connections, installing signal 6jammers or GPS blockers, or altering or manipulating software.7    "Tune" means the process by which the intelligent speed 8assistance device acquires vehicle data necessary for proper 9functionality.10    (d) The Secretary of State shall administer the 11Intelligent Speed Assistance Program and shall:12        (1) establish a method for active intelligent speed 13    assistance device approval;14        (2) approve service providers;15        (3) maintain records of all Program participants;16        (4) coordinate with courts and law enforcement 17    regarding participant enrollment and compliance;18        (5) exchange participant data with other participating 19    jurisdictions; and20        (6) establish procedures for Program requirements.21    (e) The Secretary shall suspend the driver's license or 22driving privileges of a driver who commits 2 qualifying 23offenses within a 12-month period as follows:24        (1) A 12-month suspension shall be entered by the 25    Secretary for a first suspension under this Section. The 26    Secretary shall notify the driver that if the driver   HB4948 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    enrolls in the Program and successfully drives on a Permit 2    for 6 months without a violation of the Program, the 3    suspension will terminate.4        (2) The Secretary shall notify a driver whose license 5    or privileges are suspended for a second time under this 6    Section that the suspension shall remain in effect until 7    the driver enrolls in the Program and successfully drives 8    on a Permit for 12 months without a violation of the 9    Program.10        (3) The Secretary shall notify a driver whose license 11    or privileges has been suspended for a third or subsequent 12    time under this Section that the suspension shall remain 13    in effect until the driver enrolls in the Program and 14    successfully drives on a Permit for 24 months without a 15    violation of the Program.16    A driver who elects to participate in the Program shall 17return the application to the Secretary. A driver who is 18required to participate in the Program shall return the 19application to the Secretary within 14 days of the effective 20date of the suspension of the person's license or privileges. 21A Permit shall not be issued if the Secretary finds that the 22participant's driver's license is otherwise invalid or death 23resulted from one of the qualifying offenses.24    The participant shall have 14 days from the date the 25Permit is issued to have an active intelligent speed 26assistance device installed by an approved service provider.   HB4948 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1An approved service provider shall provide proof of 2installation to the Secretary within 14 days in a manner and 3form prescribed by the Secretary. If the Secretary does not 4receive notice of installation, the Secretary shall cancel the 5Permit.6    A participant in the Program must pay the Secretary a 7Permit administration fee in an amount not to exceed $30 per 8month, to be deposited into the Intelligent Speed Assistance 9Permit Fee Fund.10    (f) A Permit shall be cancelled if the participant 11uninstalls the active intelligent speed assistance device 12without prior authorization from the Secretary.13    (g) The Secretary shall record the following data to the 14driver record:15        (1) the participant's full name, date of birth, and 16    driver's license number;17        (2) the participant's qualifying offenses;18        (3) the participant's Program enrollment date; and19        (4) the participant's Program completion date.20    (h) A person issued a Permit may drive for any purpose and 21at any time, subject to the rules adopted by the Secretary 22under subsection (r). The person must, at his or her own 23expense, drive only vehicles equipped with an active 24intelligent speed assistance device, but in no event shall the 25person drive a commercial motor vehicle.26    (i) The Secretary shall recognize and enforce minimum   HB4948 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1enrollment periods imposed by a participating jurisdiction if 2both states are participating jurisdictions.3    (j) A participant who is issued a Permit and must drive 4employer-owned vehicles in the course of the participant's 5employment duties may seek permission to drive an 6employer-owned vehicle that does not have an active 7intelligent speed assistance device. The employer shall 8provide to the Secretary a form, as prescribed by the 9Secretary, completed by the employer verifying that the 10employee must drive an employer-owned vehicle in the course of 11employment. If approved by the Secretary, the form must be in 12the participant's possession while operating an employer-owned 13vehicle not equipped with an active intelligent speed 14assistance device.15    This exemption does not apply to a participant to allow 16the participant:17        (1) to drive a school bus, school vehicle, a vehicle 18    designed to transport more than 15 passengers, or a 19    commercial motor vehicle;20        (2) to drive an employer-owned motor vehicle that is 21    owned by an entity that is wholly or partially owned by the 22    participant or by a family member of the participant;23        (3) to drive an employer-owned vehicle that is made 24    available to the participant for personal use; or25        (4) to drive an exempted vehicle for more than 12 26    hours per day, 6 days per week.  HB4948 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    (k) The Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund 2is created as a special fund in the State treasury. If the 3Secretary determines that a participant is indigent, the 4Secretary shall provide the participant with a written 5document as evidence of that determination, and the 6participant shall provide that written document to an approved 7service provider. The service provider shall install an active 8intelligent speed assistance device on the participant's 9vehicle without charge to the participant, and seek 10reimbursement from the Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance 11Device Fund.12    If the Secretary has deemed a participant indigent, the 13service provider shall also provide the normal monthly 14monitoring services and the uninstallation without charge to 15the participant and seek reimbursement from the Indigent 16Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund. Any other monetary 17charges shall be the responsibility of the participant. A 18service provider may not seek a security deposit from the 19Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund.20    (l) A service provider shall, for each active intelligent 21speed assistance device, pay 5% of the total gross revenue 22received for the intelligent speed assistance device, 23including monthly monitoring fees, into the Indigent 24Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund. This 5% shall be 25clearly indicated as a separate surcharge on each invoice that 26is issued. The Secretary shall conduct an annual review of the   HB4948 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund to determine 2whether the surcharge is sufficient to provide for indigent 3participants. The Secretary may increase or decrease this 4surcharge requirement as needed. The Secretary shall, subject 5to appropriation by the General Assembly, use all money in the 6Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund to reimburse 7service providers who have installed devices in vehicles of 8indigent participants. The Secretary shall make payments to 9the service providers every 3 months. If the amount of money in 10the Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund at the 11time payments are made is not sufficient to pay all requests 12for reimbursement submitted during that 3-month period, the 13Secretary shall make payments on a pro rata basis, and those 14payments shall be considered payment in full for the requests 15submitted. If the amount of money in the Indigent Intelligent 16Speed Assistance Device Fund exceeds the amount necessary to 17pay all requests for reimbursement during that 3-month period, 18the excess amount shall remain in the Indigent Intelligent 19Speed Assistance Device Fund. At the end of the fiscal year, 20the excess amount shall be transferred to the Intelligent 21Speed Assistance Permit Fee Fund.22    (m) Upon making a determination that a violation of the 23requirements of the Program has occurred, the Secretary shall, 24if the participant's driver's license is suspended, extend the 25participant's enrollment in the Program for 90 days. If the 26driver's license suspension has already terminated prior to   HB4948 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1the Secretary receiving the monitoring report that shows a 2violation of the Program, the Secretary is authorized to 3suspend the person's driving privileges for 90 days.4    (n) If a person subject to intelligent speed assistance 5program requirements in another participating jurisdiction 6establishes legal residence in this State:7        (1) the person shall be deemed a participant in this 8    State's Program;9        (2) the person shall comply with all requirements of 10    this Section as if originally enrolled in this State's 11    Program;12        (3) the remaining duration of the person's enrollment 13    period shall continue uninterrupted;14        (4) the person shall notify the Secretary of the 15    person's participating jurisdiction intelligent speed 16    assistance program status as part of establishing 17    residence;18        (5) the Secretary shall assume administrative 19    responsibility for the participant;20        (6) the enrollment period and all Program requirements 21    shall continue without interruption;22        (7) the participant shall verify that the 23    participant's active intelligent speed assistance device 24    meets this State's requirements within 30 days or install 25    a compliant intelligent speed assistance device; and26        (8) the Secretary shall issue a Permit with an S   HB4948 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    license restriction code to the Program participant.2    (o) If a participant relocates to a nonparticipating 3jurisdiction and establishes residency:4        (1) for a driver who is not required to participate in 5    the Program, the Secretary shall immediately cancel the 6    participant's Permit and the participant shall be required 7    to serve the remainder of the 12-month suspension imposed 8    under subsection (e);9        (2) for a driver who is required to participate in the 10    Program, the Secretary shall immediately cancel the 11    participant's Permit, the suspension imposed under 12    subsection (e) shall terminate, and the Secretary shall 13    impose a suspension for the period during which the driver 14    is required to use an active intelligent speed assistance 15    device.16    A participant shall be given credit for any time served on 17the suspension imposed under subsection (e) prior to the 18cancellation of the Permit.19    (p) Participating jurisdictions shall exchange the 20following information about participants:21        (1) the full name, date of birth, and driver's license 22    number;23        (2) the qualifying offenses and conviction dates;24        (3) Program enrollment date and scheduled completion 25    date;26        (4) the number of qualifying offenses;  HB4948 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1        (5) the history of Program enrollment; and2        (6) Program violations.3    All interstate data exchanges shall use secure 4transmission protocols, comply with all applicable federal and 5State privacy laws, and be limited to information necessary 6for Program administration and public safety.7    (q) Service providers shall only collect the following 8data:9        (1) the participating driver's full name and driver's 10    license number;11        (2) the intelligent speed assistance device 12    identification number;13        (3) the vehicle identification number;14        (4) the date, time, and duration of vehicle operation;15        (5) the posted speed limit at the vehicle's location;16        (6) the vehicle speed;17        (7) any override events, including the date, time, and 18    duration;19        (8) any tampering attempts or device malfunctions; and20        (9) location coordinates, which shall be retained only 21    for compliance verification, not for general location 22    tracking.23    A service provider shall retain Program participation data 24specified in paragraphs (1) through (3) for the duration of 25Program participation or any period as defined by the 26Secretary and in compliance with State laws and rules. A   HB4948 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1service provider shall retain Program participation data 2specified in paragraphs (4) through (9) for 30 days from the 3date the data was collected or any period as defined by the 4Secretary and in compliance with State laws and rules and must 5securely delete or dispose of the data upon expiration of the 630-day period. Except as necessary to administer the Program, 7which includes providing Program participation data specified 8in paragraphs (1) through (9) of this subsection to the 9Secretary, a service provider in possession of Program 10participation data specified in paragraphs (1) through (9) 11shall not otherwise disclose, sell, share, allow access to, or 12otherwise disseminate the data.13    (r) The Secretary may adopt rules necessary to implement 14the Program, in consultation with the Illinois State Police, 15including, but not limited to:16        (1) specifications and technical standards for active 17    intelligent speed assistance devices, including minimum 18    intelligent speed assistance device capabilities, 19    including the speed the vehicle is limited to relative to 20    the speed limit and law enforcement verification 21    protocols;22        (2) standards and procedures for approved service 23    providers;24        (3) active intelligent speed assistance device 25    installation, transfer, inspection, including inspection 26    by law enforcement, or removal;  HB4948 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1        (4) data security, retention, and privacy protocols;2        (5) procedures for interstate data exchange;3        (6) indigent qualifications;4        (7) compliance monitoring and violation reporting;5        (8) what constitutes a violation of the Program; and6        (9) procedures for the Secretary to provide 7    Intelligent Speed Assistance data to law enforcement when 8    the Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit holder is involved 9    in a traffic crash while operating a motor vehicle 10    equipped with an Intelligent Speed Assistance device.11    (s) The Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit Fee Fund is 12created as a special fund in the State treasury. The Secretary 13shall, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, use 14the money paid into the Intelligent Speed Assistance Permit 15Fee Fund to offset its administrative costs for administering 16Intelligent Speed Assistance Permits.17    (t) It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege 18is restricted by being prohibited from operating a motor 19vehicle not equipped with an intelligent speed assistance 20device to operate a motor vehicle not equipped with an 21intelligent speed assistance device.22    (u) It is unlawful to tamper with or circumvent an 23intelligent speed assistance device.24    (v) A person convicted of violation of subsection (t) or 25(u) is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.   HB4948 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    (625 ILCS 5/6-208)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-208)2    Sec. 6-208. Period of suspension - application after 3revocation. 4    (a) Except as otherwise provided by this Code or any other 5law of this State, the Secretary of State shall not suspend a 6driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive a motor 7vehicle on the highways for a period of more than one year.8    (b) Any person whose license, permit, or privilege to 9drive a motor vehicle on the highways has been revoked shall 10not be entitled to have such license, permit, or privilege 11renewed or restored. However, such person may, except as 12provided under subsections (d) and (d-5) of Section 6-205, 13make application for a license pursuant to Section 6-106 (i) 14if the revocation was for a cause that has been removed or (ii) 15as provided in the following subparagraphs:16        1. Except as provided in subparagraphs 1.3, 1.5, 2, 3, 17    4, and 5, the person may make application for a license (A) 18    after the expiration of one year from the effective date 19    of the revocation, (B) in the case of a violation of 20    paragraph (b) of Section 11-401 of this Code or a similar 21    provision of a local ordinance, after the expiration of 3 22    years from the effective date of the revocation, or (C) in 23    the case of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code 24    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision 25    of a law of another state relating to the offense of 26    reckless homicide or a violation of subparagraph (F) of   HB4948 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    paragraph 1 of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of this 2    Code relating to aggravated driving under the influence of 3    alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 4    compounds, or any combination thereof, if the violation 5    was the proximate cause of a death, after the expiration 6    of 2 years from the effective date of the revocation or 7    after the expiration of 24 months from the date of release 8    from a period of imprisonment as provided in Section 6-103 9    of this Code, whichever is later.10        1.3. If the person is convicted of a second or 11    subsequent violation of Section 11-501 of this Code or a 12    similar provision of a local ordinance or a similar 13    out-of-state offense, or Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code 14    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, in which the use of 15    alcohol or other drugs is recited as an element of the 16    offense, or a similar out-of-state offense, or a 17    combination of these offenses, arising out of separate 18    occurrences, that person may not make application for a 19    driver's license until:20            (A) the person has first been issued a restricted 21        driving permit by the Secretary of State; and22            (B) the expiration of a continuous period of not 23        less than 5 years following the issuance of the 24        restricted driving permit during which the person's 25        restricted driving permit is not suspended, cancelled, 26        or revoked for a violation of any provision of law, or   HB4948 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1        any rule or regulation of the Secretary of State 2        relating to the required use of an ignition interlock 3        device. 4        1.5. If the person is convicted of a violation of 5    Section 6-303 of this Code committed while his or her 6    driver's license, permit, or privilege was revoked because 7    of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 8    or the Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of 9    reckless homicide, or a similar provision of a law of 10    another state, the person may not make application for a 11    license or permit until the expiration of 3 years from the 12    date of the conviction. 13        2. If such person is convicted of committing a second 14    violation within a 20-year period of:15            (A) Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar 16        provision of a local ordinance;17            (B) Paragraph (b) of Section 11-401 of this Code 18        or a similar provision of a local ordinance;19            (C) Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 20        Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of 21        reckless homicide; or22            (D) any combination of the above offenses 23        committed at different instances;24    then such person may not make application for a license 25    until after the expiration of 5 years from the effective 26    date of the most recent revocation. The 20-year period   HB4948 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    shall be computed by using the dates the offenses were 2    committed and shall also include similar out-of-state 3    offenses and similar offenses committed on a military 4    installation.5        2.5. If a person is convicted of a second violation of 6    Section 6-303 of this Code committed while the person's 7    driver's license, permit, or privilege was revoked because 8    of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 9    or the Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of 10    reckless homicide, or a similar provision of a law of 11    another state, the person may not make application for a 12    license or permit until the expiration of 5 years from the 13    date of release from a term of imprisonment. 14        3. However, except as provided in subparagraph 4, if 15    such person is convicted of committing a third violation 16    or any combination of the above offenses, including 17    similar out-of-state offenses and similar offenses 18    committed on a military installation, contained in 19    subparagraph 2, then such person may not make application 20    for a license until after the expiration of 10 years from 21    the effective date of the most recent revocation.22        4. Except as provided in paragraph (1.5) of subsection 23    (c) of Section 6-205 and subparagraph (F) of paragraph 3 24    of subsection (c) of Section 6-206 of this Code, the 25    person may not make application for a license if the 26    person is convicted of committing a fourth or subsequent   HB4948 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    violation of Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar 2    provision of a local ordinance, Section 11-401 of this 3    Code, Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 4    Criminal Code of 2012, or a combination of these offenses, 5    similar provisions of local ordinances, similar 6    out-of-state offenses, or similar offenses committed on a 7    military installation.8        4.5. A bona fide resident of a foreign jurisdiction 9    who is subject to the provisions of subparagraph 4 of this 10    subsection (b) may make application for termination of the 11    revocation after a period of 10 years from the effective 12    date of the most recent revocation. However, if a person 13    who has been granted a termination of revocation under 14    this subparagraph 4.5 subsequently becomes a resident of 15    this State, the revocation shall be reinstated and the 16    person shall be subject to the provisions of subparagraph 17    4. 18        5. The person may not make application for a license 19    or permit if the person is convicted of a third or 20    subsequent violation of Section 6-303 of this Code 21    committed while his or her driver's license, permit, or 22    privilege was revoked because of a violation of Section 23    9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 24    2012, relating to the offense of reckless homicide, or a 25    similar provision of a law of another state. 26        6. If the person's driving privilege is revoked under   HB4948 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    paragraph (16) of subsection (a) of Section 6-205 where 2    the driver was convicted of a violation of Section 3    11-601.5, that person may not make application for a 4    driver's license until the person has first been issued a 5    restricted driving permit requiring the use of an 6    intelligent speed assistance device by the Secretary of 7    State and (i) if the person has not previously been 8    enrolled in the Intelligent Speed Assistance Program, the 9    expiration of not less than 365 days following the 10    issuance of a restricted driving permit requiring the use 11    of an intelligent speed assistance device during which the 12    person's restricted driving permit is not suspended, 13    cancelled, or revoked for a violation of a provision of 14    law or rule of the Secretary of State, including, but not 15    limited to, a violation of the intelligent speed 16    assistance device, (ii) if the person has previously been 17    enrolled in the Intelligent Speed Assistance Program one 18    time, the expiration of not less than 730 days following 19    the issuance of a restricted driving permit requiring the 20    use of an intelligent speed assistance device during which 21    the person's restricted driving permit is not suspended, 22    cancelled, or revoked for a violation of a provision of 23    law or rule of the Secretary of State, including, but not 24    limited to, a violation of the intelligent speed 25    assistance device, or (iii) if the person has previously 26    been enrolled in the Intelligent Speed Assistance Program   HB4948 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 18443 LNS 31885 b1    2 or more times, the expiration of 1,095 days following 2    the issuance of a restricted driving permit requiring the 3    use of an intelligent speed assistance device during which 4    the person's restricted driving permit is not suspended, 5    cancelled, or revoked for a violation of a provision of 6    law or rule of the Secretary of State, including, but not 7    limited to, a violation of the intelligent speed 8    assistance device.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, all 10persons referred to in this paragraph (b) may not have their 11privileges restored until the Secretary receives payment of 12the required reinstatement fee pursuant to subsection (b) of 13Section 6-118.14    In no event shall the Secretary issue such license unless 15and until such person has had a hearing pursuant to this Code 16and the appropriate administrative rules and the Secretary is 17satisfied, after a review or investigation of such person, 18that to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the 19highways will not endanger the public safety or welfare.20    (c) (Blank). 21(Source: P.A. 99-290, eff. 1-1-16; 99-296, eff. 1-1-16; 2299-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 241, 2028.